Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF838.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2391YH (7) 91 da/ns H.F. 838 Section 1. Section 137F.11A, Code 2025, is amended to read 1 as follows: 2 137F.11A Posting of Routine inspection reports report . 3 An A food establishment inspected under this chapter shall 4 post the most recent routine inspection report, along with any 5 current complaint or reinspection reports, in a location at the 6 food establishment that is readily visible to the public. The 7 department may require that the food establishment serving food 8 to the public for on-premises consumption post the most recent 9 routine inspection report near its corresponding report card as 10 required in section 137F.11B. 11 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 137F.11B Routine inspection report 12 card. 13 1. After completing a routine inspection report of a food 14 establishment serving food to the public for on-premises 15 consumption as provided in section 137F.11A, a regulatory 16 authority shall complete a routine inspection report card. The 17 routine inspection report card must be on a form prepared and 18 printed by the department. The form must explain the criteria 19 for assigning a letter grade and its corresponding rating. 20 2. a. In completing a routine inspection report card, 21 the regulatory authority shall assign an inspected food 22 establishment a letter as follows: 23 (1) âAâ as the highest letter grade, indicating a rating 24 of ninety percent or better but not higher than one hundred 25 percent. 26 (2) âBâ as the next highest letter grade, indicating 27 a rating of eighty percent or better but less than ninety 28 percent. 29 (3) âCâ as the lowest letter grade indicating a rating of 30 seventy-five percent or better but not less than seventy-five 31 percent. 32 b. The food establishment may request that the corresponding 33 numerical rating be included with the letter grade. 34 3. The license issued to a food establishment under this 35 -1- LSB 2391YH (7) 91 da/ns 1/ 3 H.F. 838 chapter shall be suspended as provided in section 137F.7 1 if a food establishment is assigned a rating of less than 2 seventy-five percent. 3 4. The food establishment shall post the most recent 4 routine inspection report card near each entrance to the 5 food establishment regularly used by its customers or in 6 another conspicuous place selected by the regulatory authority 7 conducting the inspection. 8 5. Upon a reinspection report issued under section 9 137F.11A, the regulatory authority shall complete a new routine 10 inspection report card which shall be posted as provided in 11 subsection 4. 12